Utah statutes.
59-2-913.   Definitions -- Statement of amount and purpose of levy --
Contents of statement -- Filing with county auditor -- Transmittal to
commission -- Calculations for establishing tax levies -- Format of statement.
(1)  As used in this section, "budgeted property tax revenues" does not
include property tax revenue received by a taxing entity from personal
property that is:
(a)  assessed by a county assessor in accordance with Part 3, County
Assessment; and
(b)  semiconductor manufacturing equipment.
(2) (a)  The legislative body of each taxing entity shall file a statement as
provided in this section with the county auditor of the county in which the
taxing entity is located.
(b)  The auditor shall annually transmit the statement to the commission:
(i)  before June 22; or
(ii)  with the approval of the commission, on a subsequent date prior to the
date established under Section 59-2-1317 for mailing tax notices.
(c)  The statement shall contain the amount and purpose of each levy fixed by
the legislative body of the taxing entity.
(3)  For purposes of establishing the levy set for each of a taxing entity's
applicable funds, the legislative body of the taxing entity shall calculate an
amount determined by dividing the budgeted property tax revenues, specified in
a budget which has been adopted and approved prior to setting the levy, by the
amount calculated under Subsections 59-2-924(3)(c)(ii)(A) through (C).
(4)  The format of the statement under this section shall:
(a)  be determined by the commission; and
(b)  cite any applicable statutory provisions that:
(i)  require a specific levy; or
(ii)  limit the property tax levy for any taxing entity.
(5)  The commission may require certification that the information submitted
on a statement under this section is true and correct.
